Massachusetts, session 194th, H3396.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 2 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 official edition, is hereby
amended by inserting the following section:-
Section 65. “Bell’s Seasoning,” created by William G. Bell, a Boston inventor in 1867
and manufactured in East Weymouth Massachusetts, shall be the official seasoning of the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts
of 1